intl/locales/kn/hyphenation/hyph_kn.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
ಅ1
ಆ1
ಇ1
ಈ1
ಉ1
ಊ1
ಋ1
ೠ1
ಌ1
ೡ1
ಎ1
ಏ1
ಐ1
ಒ1
ಓ1
ಔ1
ಾ1
ಿ1
ೀ1
ು1
ೂ1
ೃ1
ೄ1
ೆ1
ೇ1
ೈ1
ೊ1
ೋ1
ೌ1
1ಕ
1ಖ
1ಗ
1ಘ
1ಙ
1ಚ
1ಛ
1ಜ
1ಝ
1ಞ
1ಟ
1ಠ
1ಡ
1ಢ
1ಣ
1ತ
1ಥ
1ದ
1ಧ
1ನ
1ಪ
1ಫ
1ಬ
1ಭ
1ಮ
1ಯ
1ರ
1ಱ
1ಲ
1ಳ
1ೞ
1ವ
1ಶ
1ಷ
1ಸ
1ಹ
2ಂ1
2ಃ1
2ಽ1
2ೕ1
2ೖ1
2್2
